Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-202.09
Cemetery organization; exemption; application; procedure; late filing.

Any cemetery organization seeking a tax exemption for any real property used to maintain areas set apart for the interment of human dead shall apply for exemption to the county assessor on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. An application for a tax exemption shall be made on or before December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is sought. The county assessor shall examine the application and recommend either taxable or exempt to the county board of equalization on or before March 1 following. If a cemetery organization seeks a tax exemption for any real or tangible personal property acquired for or converted to exempt use on or after January 1, the organization shall make application for exemption on or before July 1. The procedure for reviewing the application shall be the same as for other exemptions pursuant to subdivisions (1)(c) and (d) of section 77-202. Any cemetery organization which fails to file on or before December 31 for exemption may apply on or before June 30 pursuant to subsection (2) of section 77-202.01, and the penalty and procedures specified in section 77-202.01 shall apply.

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 271, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB708, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB63, § 2.